Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1829
Disclosure of information; limitations.

(1) The commission shall not disclose to or allow inspection by anyone, including, but not limited to, parties to a regulatory proceeding before the commission, any information of a jurisdictional utility that qualifies as a record which may be withheld from the public upon request of the party submitting such record if the information qualifies under subdivision (3) of section 84-712.05, unless the commission finds that disclosure is warranted after consideration of the following factors:

(a) Whether disclosure will significantly aid the commission in fulfilling its functions;

(b) The harm or benefit which disclosure will cause to the public interest;

(c) The harm which disclosure will cause to the utility; and

(d) Alternatives to disclosure that will serve the public interest and protect the utility.

(2) If the commission finds that disclosure is warranted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the commission shall give the utility notice before disclosing such information.

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 29.